test/src/gt-norm.Latn-yamls/latin-spelling_gt-norm.Latn.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../src/generator-gt-norm.Latn.hfst
    Morph: ../../src/analyser-gt-norm.Latn.hfst

Tests:
  
  When {w} is spelled as v vs w:  # making sure they can also take case endings as if they were just a noun
    # Word initial -> v
    vendë+N+Sing+All: vendenna
    # Intervocalic -> v
    Yehóva+N+Sing+Nom: Yehóva
    # Elsewhere -> w
    atar+N+Sing+Poss: atarwa
    # regular w stays
    aiwë+N+Sing+All: aiwenna
  
  Proper spelling with þ:
    tasar+N+Sing+Nom: tasar
    ces-+V+Fut+Sing: cesuva
    ces-+V+Past+Plur: cesser
    sinda+A: sinda
    sinda+A+Superl: assinda
  
  Proper use of diaeresis:
    # non-final e
    tyalië+N+Sing+All: tyalienna
    tië+N+Sing+All: tienna
    loëndë+N+Sing+All: loëndenna
    laurëa+A: laurëa
    lassë+N+Sing+Gen: lassëo
    ceuta-+V+Pres+Sing: ceuta
    cemen+N+Sing+Nom: cemen
    # e as the only vowel
    ve+Adp: ve
    # word-final e
    tië+N+Sing+Loc: tiessë
    laurëa+A+Nsing: laurië
    # capital E
    Eärendil+N+Sing+Nom: Eärendil
    Elendil+N+Sing+Nom: Elendil
    Eönwë+N+Sing+Nom: Eönwë
